en: white peach, white peaches
de: Weißer Pfirsich, weiße Pfirsiche
fr: pêche blanche
hr: bijela breskva
it: pesca bianca

en: peach puree
bg: пюре от праскови, пюре от праскова
da: ferskenpuré
de: Pfirsichpurée
es: pure de melocotón
fi: persikkapyree, persikkasose
fr: purée de pêches, purée de pêche
hr: kaša breskve
it: purea di pesche
nl: perzikenpuree
pt: puré de pêssego
sv: persikopuré

en: peach pulp
cs: broskvová dřeň

en: peach juice
it: succo di pesca

en: peach juice from concentrate
de: pfirsichsaft aus pfirsichsaftkonzentrat
it: succo di pesca da concentrato

fr: jus de pêche blanche à base de concentré
bg: бял персик сок от концентрат
de: Weißer Pfirsichsaft aus Konzentrat
es: jugo de melocotón blanco a base de concentrado
it: succo di pesca bianca concentrato
nl: witte perziksap uit concentraat

en: peach syrup
bg: сироп от праскови
de: Pfirsichsirup
fi: persikkasiirappi
fr: sirop de pêche
hr: sirup od breskve
it: sciroppo di pesca
nl: perzikensiroop

en: dried peach
de: getrocknete Pfirsiche
es: melocotón seco
fr: Pêche sèche
hr: sušena breskva
it: pesche secche
lt: džiovinti persikų gabalėliai
nl: gedroogde perzik
pt: pêssego seco

en: peach paste
de: Pfirsichpaste Pfirsichteig
fi: persikkatahna
hr: pasta od breskve
it: pasta di pesca
sv: persikopasta

fr: pêche au sirop
de: Pfirsich in Sirup
es: melocotón en almíbar
it: pesche sciroppate
nl: perziken op siroop
pt: pêssegos em calda

en: pear, pears
af: peer
ar: بواويد, إجاص
az: armud
be: груша
bg: круша, круши
bn: নাশপাতি
bo: ལི།
br: per
bs: kruška
ca: pera, Selecció de peres
co: pera
cs: hruška
cy: gellygen
da: pære, pærer
de: Birne, Birnen
el: αχλάδι
eo: piro
es: pera
et: pirn
eu: madari, udare
fa: گلابی
fi: päärynä
fo: pera
fr: poire, poires
fy: par
ga: péire, piorra
gd: peur
gl: pera
gv: peear
he: אגס
hi: नाशपाती
hr: kruška, kruške
ht: pwar
hu: körte
hy: տանձ
id: buah pir
ig: ùbé, ube
io: piro
is: pera
it: pera, pere
ja: 梨
ka: მსხალი
kk: алмұрт
km: ផ្លែភា
ko: 배
ku: hirmê
kw: per
ky: алмурут
la: pirum
lb: Bir, Bier
li: paer
lo: ໝາກຈອງ
lt: kriaušė
lv: bumbieris
mi: pea
mk: кру́ша
ml: പിയർ
mt: lanġasa
my: သစ်တောသီး
nb: pære
nl: peer, peren
nn: pære
nv: bilasáana bitseeʼ nineezígíí
oc: pera
or: ନାସ୍ପାତି
os: кӕрдо
pa: ਨਾਸ਼ਪਾਤੀ
pl: gruszka, gruszki, owoc gruszki, gruszek
pt: pêra
rm: pair
ro: pară
ru: груша
sc: pira
se: beron
sh: kruška
sk: hruška
sl: hruška
sq: dardha
sr: крушка
st: pere
sv: päron
sw: pea
ta: பேரிக்காய்
tg: мурӯд
th: ลูกแพร์
tk: armyt
tl: peras
tr: armut
tt: армут
ug: نەشپۈت
uk: груша
ur: ناشپاتی
uz: nok
vi: lê
vo: bün
wa: poere
yi: באר
zh: 梨

en: Asian pear, nashi pear, apple pear
ca: pera asiàtica
da: nashipære, nashi-pære, asiatisk pære
de: Nashibirne
eo: azia piro
fr: nashi
sl: naši
sv: nashipäron, nashi-päron

en: Bosc pear, Beurré Bosc pear
xx: Calebasse Bosc, Beurré Bosc
cs: Boscova lahvice
da: Bosc-pære
de: Boscs Flaschenbirne
eu: Bosc udarea
fr: poire Beurré Bosc
hr: Boskova bočica
hy: Բերե Բոսկ
ka: ბერე ბოსკი
la: Pyrus communis ‘Calebasse Bosc’
pl: Bera Boska
sv: Bosc-päron
tg: Береи Боск
vi: Lê Bosc

en: d'Anjou pear, Anjou pear
xx: d'Anjou, Anjou, Beurré d'Anjou, Nec Plus Meuris
da: anjoupære
es: pera de Anjou
fr: beurré d'Anjou
ru: Анжу
sv: anjoupäron

en: Conference pear
xx: Conference
da: conferencepære
de: Conference-Birne
es: pera conferencia
eu: konferentzia madaria
fr: poire conférence
hr: konferencijska kruška
ig: conference pear
it: pera conferenza
la: pyrus communis ‘Conference’
nl: conference peer
pl: gruszka konferencyjna, konferencja
pt: pêra conferência
ru: груша конференция
sk: konferencia
sv: conferencepäron
zh: 展會梨

en: Williams' bon chrétien pear, Williams pear, Bartlett pear, bartlett pears
xx: Williams' bon chrétien
bg: Вилямова масловка
cs: Williamsova
de: Williamsbirnen, Walliser Williamsbirnen
eo: vilhelmopiro
es: pera Williams, peras Williams de los coteaux du Lyonnais
eu: Williams udarea
fr: poire Williams, poires Williams des coteaux du Lyonnais
it: pera Williams, pere Williams dei coteaux du Lyonnais
ja: バートレット
ka: ვილიამსი
la: Pyrus communis 'Williams Bon Chrétien'
nl: Williams peren, Walliser Williams peren
pl: Bonkreta Williamsa
ru: Груша ʽВильямс’
sl: viljamovka
sv: williamspäron
tg: Вилямс (навъи нок)
zh: 威廉斯梨

en: pears in cubes
da: pærer i terninger
de: gewürfelte Birnen
es: peras en cubos, peras cubeteadas
fi: päärynäkuutiot
fr: poires en cubes
hr: kruške u kockama
it: pere a cubetti
nl: perenblokjes

en: pear puree
bg: пюре от круши
de: Birnenpüree
es: puré de pera
fi: päärynäpyree
fr: purée de poires, purée de poire, pulpe de poire d'été
hr: kaša kruške
it: purea di pera
nl: perenpuree
pl: przecier gruszkowy
pt: Puré de pêra
ro: piure de pere

en: Williams pear puree
de: Williams Birnenpüree
es: pure de pera Williams
fr: purée de poire Williams, pulpe de poire Williams, Pulpe de poire William’s
hr: pire od viljamovke
it: pureau di pera Williams
nl: Williams perenpuree

en: concentrated pear puree
de: konzentriertes Birnenpüree
es: pure de pera concentrado
fr: purée concentré de poire
hr: koncentrirani pire od krušaka
it: purea concentrata di pera
nl: geconcentreerde perenpuree